Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201081-1108.12
State Building Administrator;
qualifications.

The State Building Administrator shall be
a person who has (1)(a) a
bachelor's degree or higher degree from an accredited college or university or (b) at least five years' experience
in property management or building management and (2) at
least four years' administrative experience in planning, design, or construction
of major construction projects.

Laws 1969, c. 772, § 2, p. 2923;

R.R.S.1943, § 81-1108.04;

Laws 1974, LB 1048, § 3;

Laws 2010, LB721, § 1.